Hawaii statutes.
§571-72 Duties and powers; reports;
expungement of juvenile arrest records. (a) The juvenile division or
section shall direct its attention specifically to the suppression, prevention,
and investigation of crimes committed by children under the age of eighteen
years, and any police officer shall have the power and authority to take and
detain any minor coming under section 571-11 at the division or section or
other suitable places for questioning and investigation. If it appears upon
conclusion of the investigation that the minor does come within such
provisions, the minor may be counseled and released, and follow-up counseling
provided or the minor may be referred to the family court or to a proper agency
for treatment, and a written report of the findings of the officer shall be
submitted to the court or agency.

(b) Upon receipt of an expungement order
issued by the family court under section 571-88, the police shall expunge the
arrest record of the minor. [L 1965, c 232, pt of §1; Supp, §333-33; HRS
§571-72; am L 1976, c 85, §16; am L 1980, c 303, §3(1); am L 2001, c 233, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next